Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201981-3728
Vendors; duties.

Vendors under contract with the commission to develop, print, and distribute publications and promotional materials or produce, sell, and distribute tourism promotional products on behalf of the commission shall, on a monthly basis, submit to the commission all revenue received from the sale of advertising space in such publications or from the sale of such tourism promotional products. Monthly submissions shall include an itemization of the sources of revenue in a format as designated by the commission. Revenue shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Nebraska Tourism Commission Promotional Cash Fund.

Laws 2018, LB945, § 24;

Laws 2019, LB637, § 4.